Hawaii statutes.
§576E-12 Administrative orders; force and
effect. (a) A true copy of the administrative order, along with a true
copy of the return of service, shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the
circuit court in the circuit where the order was issued, or in the office of
the clerk of the circuit court in the circuit where a previously established
support order was filed. For service effectuated by certified mail, an
electronic copy or facsimile of the signature of the served individual on
certified mailers provided by the United States Postal Service shall constitute
valid proof of service on the individual. Upon filing, the order shall have
all the force and effect of a final order or decree of the circuit court.

(b) Orders for reimbursement of public
assistance shall be considered child support arrearages for purposes of
nondischargeability in bankruptcy.

(c) The administrative order shall remain in
effect until superseded by a subsequent court or administrative order.

(d) A copy of the order shall be served by
regular mail upon all parties. [L 1988, c 154, pt of §2; am L 1989, c 61, §4;
am L 1990, c 176, §18; am L 1994, c 105, §13; am L 1995, c 191, §2; am L 2009,
c 115, §5]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next